Utah statutes.
48-2a-208.   Scope of notice.

The fact that a certificate of limited partnership or amendment to a certificate of limited partnership is on file in the office of the division is notice that the partnership is a limited partnership and the persons designated as general partners are general partners, but it is not notice of any other fact.

